src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

!! # Skolt Saami Pronoun Morphology 

LEXICON PRON_
!! The lexicon *@LEXNAME@*, which is actually not needed, as pronouns get +Pron tag earlier.
 # ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG1_
+Sg1+Nom:on K ;
+Sg1:u PRON-PERS-SG-OBL ;
 PRON-PERS-DU1_ ;
 PRON-PERS-PL1_ ;
LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG2_
+Sg2+Nom:on K ;
+Sg2:u PRON-PERS-SG-OBL ;
 PRON-PERS-DU2_ ;
 PRON-PERS-PL2_ ;
LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG3_
+Sg3+Nom:on K ;
+Sg3:u PRON-PERS-SG-OBL ;
 PRON-PERS-DU3_ ;
 PRON-PERS-PL3_ ;
LEXICON PRON-PERS-DU1_
+Du1:uän PRON-PERS-DU ;
LEXICON PRON-PERS-DU2_
+Du2:uän PRON-PERS-DU ;
+Du2+Nom+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg:åna K ;
+Du2+Nom+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg:ååna K ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-DU3_
+Du3:uän PRON-PERS-DU ;
LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL1_
+Pl1: PRON-PERS-PL ;
LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL2_
+Pl2: PRON-PERS-PL ;
LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL3_
+Pl3: PRON-PERS-PL ;


LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG-OBL
+Gen:u	      K ;
+Acc:u	      K ;
+Ill:ʹnne	      K ;
+Loc:ʹst	      K ;
+Com:in	      K ;
+Abe:utää	      K ;
+Ess:uʹnen	      K ;
+Par:uʹđed	      K ;



LEXICON PRON-PERS-DU
+Nom:a		K ;
+Gen:nai	      K ;
+Acc:naid	      K ;
+Ill:naid	      K ;
+Loc:nast	      K ;
+Com:nain	      K ;
+Abe:naitää	      K ;
+Ess:nan	      K ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL
+Nom:ij		K ; !!= * @CODE@ mij, tij, sij
+Gen:ij	      K ; !!= * @CODE@ mij, tij, sij
+Gen+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg:iʹjji    K ; !!= * @CODE@ miʹjji, tiʹjji, siʹjji
+Acc:iʹjjid	      K ; !!= * @CODE@ miʹjjid, tiʹjjid, siʹjjid
+Ill:iʹjjid	      K ; !!= * @CODE@ miʹjjid, tiʹjjid, siʹjjid
+Loc:eeʹst	      K ; !!= * @CODE@ meeʹst, teeʹst, seeʹst
+Com:ijvuiʹm     K ; !!= * @CODE@ mijvuiʹm, tijvuiʹm, sijvuiʹm
+Abe:ijtää	      K ; !!= * @CODE@ mijtää, tijtää, sijtää

LEXICON PRON_KAAQLLES
: NMN_KAAQLLES ;

LEXICON PRON_MEERSAZH
: NMN_MEERSAZH ;

LEXICON PRON-REL_
: # ;

!! # Pronouns


!! Pointing to all the pronominal subgroups

LEXICON Pronoun !!= * @CODE@
!Personal ;      !!= * @CODE@
Demonstrative ; !!= * @CODE@
Reflexive ;     !!= * @CODE@
Interrogative ; !!= * @CODE@
! Reciprocal ;
 Relative ;	!!= * @CODE@ kååʹtt, mii
 Indefinite ;
 Distributive ;


!! ## Personal pronouns


!! Splitting according to person




!! ## Demonstrative pronouns


LEXICON Demonstrative !!= * @CODE@
tät+Pron+Dem:tä		SHORTDEM ;
tut+Pron+Dem:tu 	SHORTDEM ;
tõt+Pron+Dem:tõ 	SHORTDEM ;
tät+Pron+Dem:tää 	LONGDEM ;
tut+Pron+Dem:tuu 	LONGDEM ;
tõt+Pron+Dem:t  	TOTDEM ; !!= * @CODE@ The Epsilon has been removed 2015-05-13
tiet-aa:tie 		TIET-AA ;

LEXICON SHORTDEM !!= * @CODE@
+Sg+Nom:t	K ;
+Sg+Acc:n	K ;
+Sg+Gen:n	K ;
+Sg+Loc:ʹst	K ;
+Sg+Com:in	K ;
+Sg+Abe:ntää	K ;
+Pl+Nom:k	K ;
+Pl+Acc:iʹd	K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Pl+Acc:id	K ;
+Pl+Gen:i	K ;
+Pl+Ill:iʹd	K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Pl+Ill:id	K ;
+Pl+Loc:in	K ;
+Pl+Com:ivuim	K ;
+Pl+Abe:itää	K ;

LEXICON LONGDEM !!= * @CODE@
+Sg+Ill:zz	K ;
+Ess:ʹđen	K ;
+Par:đ	K ;
+Par:ʹđed	K ;

LEXICON TOTDEM  !!= * @CODE@
+Sg+Ill:õõzz 	K ;
+Ess:âʹđen 	K ;
+Par:âʹđ 	K ;
+Par:âʹđed 	K ;
+Pl+Nom:õõk 	K ;
+Pl+Gen:õõi 	K ;
+Pl+Loc:in 	K ;

LEXICON TIET-AA !!= * @CODE@
+Sg+Nom:t	-AA ;
+Sg+Acc:n	-AA ;
+Sg+Gen:n	-AA ;
+Sg+Ill:zz	-AA ;
+Sg+Loc:ʹst	-AA ;
+Sg+Com:in	-AA ;
+Pl+Nom:k	-AA ;
+Pl+Acc:id	-AA ;
+Pl+Gen:i	-AA ;
+Pl+Ill:id	-AA ;
+Pl+Com:i-aavuiʹm    K ;

LEXICON -AA !!= * @CODE@
:-aa K ;

!! ## INDEFINITE PRONOUNS
LEXICON PRON-INDEF_
+Indef: # ;

!! ## REFLEXIVE PRONOUNS

!work required
LEXICON PRON-REFL_ !! jiõčč: 
+Refl+Sg1+Acc:jiõččan # ;
+Refl+Sg1+Acc:jiiččan # ;
+Refl+Sg1+Acc:jiijjan # ;
+Refl+Sg2+Acc:jiijjad # ;
+Refl+Sg2+Acc:jiõččad # ;
+Refl+Sg3+Acc:jiijjâs # ;
+Refl+Sg3+Acc:jiiʹjjes # ;
+Refl+Pl1+Acc:jiõččân # ;
+Refl+Pl1+Acc:jiiččân # ;
+Refl+Pl1+Acc:jiijjân # ;
+Refl+Pl1+Acc:jieʹččen # ;
+Refl+Pl1+Acc:jiiʹjjen # ;
+Refl+Pl2+Acc:jiijjâd # ;
+Refl+Pl2+Acc:jiiʹjjed # ;
+Refl+Pl2+Acc:jiiʹjjeed # ;
+Refl+Pl3+Acc:jiijjâz # ;
+Refl+Pl3+Acc:jiiʹjjez # ;
+Refl+Pl3+Acc:jiiʹjjeez # ;

+Refl+Sg1+Gen:jiõččan # ;
+Refl+Sg1+Gen:jiijjan # ;
+Refl+Sg2+Gen:jiijjad # ;
+Refl+Sg2+Gen:jiõččad # ;
+Refl+Sg2+Gen:jiõjjad # ;
+Refl+Sg3+Gen:jiijjâs # ;
+Refl+Sg3+Gen:jiiʹjjes # ;
+Refl+Pl1+Gen:jiõččân # ;
+Refl+Pl1+Gen:jiiččân # ;
+Refl+Pl1+Gen:jiijjân # ;
+Refl+Pl1+Gen:jieʹččen # ;
+Refl+Pl1+Gen:jiiʹjjen # ;
+Refl+Pl2+Gen:jiijjâd # ;
+Refl+Pl2+Gen:jiiʹjjed # ;
+Refl+Pl2+Gen:jiiʹjjeed # ;
+Refl+Pl3+Gen:jiijjâz # ;
+Refl+Pl3+Gen:jiiʹjjez # ;
+Refl+Pl3+Gen:jiiʹjjeez # ;

+Refl+Sg1+Ill:jiõcˈcsan # ;
+Refl+Sg1+Ill:jiccsan # ;
+Refl+Sg1+Ill:jiõccan # ;
+Refl+Sg2+Ill:jiõcˈcsad # ;
+Refl+Sg2+Ill:jiccsad # ;
+Refl+Sg3+Ill:jiõcˈcses # ;
+Refl+Sg3+Ill:jiccses # ;
+Refl+Sg3+Ill:jiõcces # ;
+Refl+Pl1+Ill:jiõcˈcseen # ;
+Refl+Pl1+Ill:jiccseen # ;
+Refl+Pl1+Ill:jiõcceen # ;
+Refl+Pl2+Ill:jiõcˈcseed # ;
+Refl+Pl2+Ill:jiccseed # ;
+Refl+Pl2+Ill:jiõcceed # ;
+Refl+Pl3+Ill:jiõcˈcseez # ;
+Refl+Pl3+Ill:jiccseez # ;
+Refl+Pl3+Ill:jiõcceez # ;

+Refl+Sg1+Loc:jijstan # ;
+Refl+Sg1+Loc:jiijjstan # ;
+Refl+Sg2+Loc:jijstad # ;
+Refl+Sg2+Loc:jiijjstad # ;
+Refl+Sg3+Loc:jijstes # ;
+Refl+Sg3+Loc:jiijjstes # ;
+Refl+Pl1+Loc:jijsteen # ;
+Refl+Pl1+Loc:jiijjsteen # ;
+Refl+Pl2+Loc:jijsteed # ;
+Refl+Pl2+Loc:jiijjsteed # ;
+Refl+Pl3+Loc:jijsteez # ;
+Refl+Pl3+Loc:jiijjsteez # ;

+Refl+Sg1+Com:jiijjinan # ;
+Refl+Sg1+Com:jiõččinan # ;
+Refl+Sg1+Com:jičinan # ;
+Refl+Sg2+Com:jiijjinad # ;
+Refl+Sg2+Com:jiõččinad # ;
+Refl+Sg3+Com:jiijjines # ;
+Refl+Sg3+Com:jiõččines # ;
+Refl+Pl1+Com:jiijjeenvuiʹm # ;
+Refl+Pl1+Com:jiõččineen # ;
+Refl+Pl2+Com:jiijjeedvuiʹm # ;
+Refl+Pl2+Com:jiõččineed # ;
+Refl+Pl3+Com:jiijjeezvuiʹm # ;
+Refl+Pl3+Com:jiõččineez # ;

+Refl+Sg1+Ess:jiõččnan # ;
+Refl+Sg2+Ess:jiõččnad # ;
+Refl+Sg3+Ess:jiõččnes # ;
+Refl+Pl1+Ess:jiõččneen # ;
+Refl+Pl2+Ess:jiõččneed # ;
+Refl+Pl3+Ess:jiõččneez # ;



! Still work to be done 2016-11-20
!LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG1_
!+Refl+Sg1: K ;
!LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG2_
!+Refl+Sg2: K ;
!LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG3_
!+Refl+Sg3: K ;
!LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL1_
!+Refl+Pl1: K ;
!LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL2_
!+Refl+Pl2: K ;
LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL3_
+Refl+Pl3: K ; ! jiijjâz

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG-NOM_
+Refl+Sg+Nom: K ;
!LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL-NOM_
!+Refl+Pl+Nom: K ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG1-COM_
+Refl+Sg1+Com: # ;
!LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG2-COM_
!+Refl+Sg2+Com: # ;
!LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG3-COM_
!+Refl+Sg3+Com: # ;
!LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL1-COM_
!+Refl+Pl1+Com: # ;
!LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL2-COM_
!+Refl+Pl2+Com: # ;
!LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL3-COM_
!+Refl+Pl3+Com: # ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG1-ILL_
+Refl+Sg1+Ill: # ;
!LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG2-ILL_
!+Refl+Sg2+Ill: # ;
!LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG3-ILL_
!+Refl+Sg3+Ill: # ;
!LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL1-ILL_
!+Refl+Pl1+Ill: # ;
!LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL2-ILL_
!+Refl+Pl2+Ill: # ;
!LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL3-ILL_
!+Refl+Pl3+Ill: # ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG1-LOC_
+Refl+Sg1+Loc: # ;
LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG2-LOC_
+Refl+Sg2+Loc: # ;
LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG3-LOC_
+Refl+Sg3+Loc: # ;
LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL1-LOC_
+Refl+Pl1+Loc: # ;
LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL2-LOC_
+Refl+Pl2+Loc: # ;
LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL3-LOC_
+Refl+Pl3+Loc: # ;
