src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
tät+Pron+Dem:tä		SHORTDEM ;
tut+Pron+Dem:tu		SHORTDEM ;
tõt+Pron+Dem:tõ		SHORTDEM ;
tät+Pron+Dem:tää	LONGDEM ;
tut+Pron+Dem:tuu	LONGDEM ;
tõt+Pron+Dem:t		TOTDEM ;
tiet-aa+Pron+Dem:tie		TIET-AA ;
